New York, session 2025-2026, S614.
do enact as follows:
Section 1. Section 364-i of the social services law is amended by
adding a new subdivision 9 to read as follows:
9. (a) An individual who is incarcerated by the department of
corrections and community supervision, or in a local correctional facil-
ity as defined in section two of the correction law, shall be presumed
eligible for medical assistance under this title beginning on the date
of their release from the incarceration, where the department of
corrections and community supervision or the local correctional facility
determines, on the basis of preliminary information, that the individual
is eligible for coverage under paragraphs (b) or (c) of subdivision one
of section three hundred sixty-six of this title.
(b) The presumptive eligibility shall continue through the earlier of:
the day on which eligibility is determined under this title; or, in the
case of an individual for whom an application for assistance under this
title is not filed or who does not file an application for such assist-
ance, sixty days after release of such individual from incarceration.
(c) This subdivision shall be effective only if, and as long as,
federal financial participation is available for expenditures incurred
under this subdivision.
EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets
[ ] is old law to be omitted.
LBD00018-05-6

S. 614--A 2
(d) The commissioner of health shall take all steps necessary and
shall use best efforts to secure federal financial participation for
purposes of this subdivision, including the prompt submission of appro-
priate amendments to the state plan under title XIX of the federal
social security act.
(e) The commissioner shall also develop materials to educate individ-
uals leaving correctional facilities about the medical assistance
program, including what steps need to be taken to ensure continued
enrollment in the program for those deemed presumptively eligible, and
how to begin receiving medical services upon release from incarceration.
§ 2. Section 71 of the correction law is amended by adding a new
subdivision 9 to read as follows:
9. (a) The commissioner shall take all steps necessary to enroll into
the medical assistance for needy persons program under title eleven of
article five of the social services law any individual committed to the
custody of the department, under subdivision nine of section three
hundred sixty-four-i of the social services law, unless the department
determines that such application is unnecessary because the individual
was enrolled in the medical assistance program at the time of their
incarceration and is expected to remain so at the time of release or
because the individual is ineligible for enrollment in such program or
does not wish to be enrolled. The commissioner shall ensure rein-
statement and active enrollment into the medical assistance program for
individuals who have maintained eligibility pursuant to subdivision
one-a of section three hundred sixty-six of the social services law.
Provided, however, that no such medical assistance shall be furnished
for any care, services, or supplies provided during such time as the
person is incarcerated except as authorized under subdivision one-a of
section three hundred sixty-six of the social services law or as author-
ized under any other applicable state or federal law or regulation
permitting the provision of such medical assistance. For individuals
successfully enrolled under this subdivision, any documents relating to
enrollment shall be kept in the individual's records until the individ-
ual's release from custody, at which time such documents shall be
provided to the individual where practicable.
(b) Where an individual is found ineligible for the medical assistance
program, the department shall make diligent efforts to determine whether
the individual is eligible for any other medical insurance program and,
if so, assist the individual in applying to the program for which they
are eligible if they wish to enroll in such program prior to release.
§ 3. The correction law is amended by adding a new section 500-r to
read as follows:
§ 500-r. Medicaid enrollment. 1. Where practicable, for any individual
incarcerated in a local correctional facility, the superintendent of
such facility shall take all steps necessary for enrollment into the
medical assistance for needy persons program under title eleven of arti-
cle five of the social services law, under subdivision nine of section
three hundred sixty-four-i of the social services law, unless the super-
intendent determines that such application is unnecessary because the
individual was enrolled in the medical assistance program at the time of
their incarceration and is expected to remain so at the time of release,
or because the individual is ineligible for enrollment in such program
or does not wish to be enrolled. The superintendent shall ensure rein-
statement and active enrollment into the medical assistance program for
individuals who have maintained eligibility pursuant to subdivision
one-a of section three hundred sixty-six of the social services law.

S. 614--A 3
Provided, however, that no such medical assistance shall be furnished
for any care, services, or supplies provided during such time as the
person is incarcerated except as authorized under subdivision one-a of
section three hundred sixty-six of the social services law or as author-
ized under any other applicable state or federal law or regulation
permitting the provision of such medical assistance. For individuals
successfully enrolled under this subdivision, any documents relating to
enrollment shall be kept in the individual's records until the individ-
ual's release from custody, at which time such documents shall be
provided to the individual where practicable.
2. When a local correctional facility is unable to complete an appli-
cation for medical assistance prior to an individual's release from its
custody, the facility shall assist the individual in the completion of
any requirements necessary for a presumptive eligibility determination
prior to such individual's release unless the individual decides that
they do not wish to enroll in the program. The superintendent shall
assist individuals to submit any preliminary information that may be
necessary to meet presumptive eligibility requirements under subdivision
nine of section three hundred sixty-four-i of the social services law.
3. Where an individual is found ineligible for the medical assistance
program, the superintendent shall make diligent efforts to determine
whether the individual is eligible for any other medical insurance
program and, if so, assist the individual in applying to the program for
which they are eligible if they wish to enroll in such program prior to
release.
§ 4. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 3 of section 366-a of the social
services law, as amended by chapter 41 of the laws of 1992, is amended
to read as follows:
(b) notify the applicant in writing of the decision, and where such
applicant is found eligible, provide a tamper resistant identification
card containing a photo image of the applicant for use in securing
medical assistance under this title provided, however, that an identifi-
cation card need not contain a photo image of a person other than an
adult member of an eligible household or a single-person eligible house-
hold. The department is not required to provide, but shall seek practi-
cal methods for providing, a card with such picture to a person when
such person is homebound or is a resident of a residential health care
facility, or an in-patient psychiatric facility, or is expected to
remain hospitalized for an extended period. Where the applicant is
incarcerated by the department of corrections and community supervision
or in a local correctional facility as defined in section two of the
correction law, the appropriate social services official or the depart-
ment of health or its agent shall provide such identification card to
the department of corrections and community supervision or local correc-
tional facility for keeping with the incarcerated individual's records
until such individual is released. The commissioner shall have the
authority to define categories of recipients who are not required to
have a photo identification card where such card would be limited,
unnecessary or impracticable.
§ 5. Paragraphs (e) and (f) of subdivision 9 of section 500-b of the
correction law, as amended by chapter 574 of the laws of 1985, are
amended to read as follows:
(e) court orders which have been issued and which relate to staffing,
jail capacity or security requirements; [and]
(f) the number of any individuals in the custody of each facility (1)
enrolled in medical assistance or other medical insurance programs at

S. 614--A 4
the time of their incarceration; (2) enrolled into such programs during
their incarceration, including whether they were enrolled through social
services districts or the New York State of Health benefits exchange
portal; and
(g) any other information requested by the commission and available to
the chief administrative officer with respect to this section.
§ 6. Section 45 of the correction law is amended by adding a new
subdivision 20 to read as follows:
20. Make an annual report, in consultation with the commissioner of
health, to the governor, the temporary president of the senate and the
speaker of the assembly containing information obtained from local
correctional facilities under paragraph (f) of subdivision nine of
section five hundred-b of this chapter regarding enrollment in the
medical assistance for needy persons program or other medical insurance
program of applicants in the custody of local correctional facilities.
The first report under this subdivision will be completed by December
thirty-first, two thousand twenty-seven, and annually thereafter.
§ 7. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after
it shall have become a law; provided, however, that the amendments to
section 500-b of the correction law made by section five of this act
shall not affect the repeal of such section and shall be deemed repealed
therewith. Effective immediately, the commissioner of health, the
commissioner of corrections and community supervision, and the super-
intendents of local correctional facilities shall make regulations and
take other actions reasonably necessary to implement the provisions of
this act on its effective date.